Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.515

Foundational public health services—Funding.

(1) With any state funding of foundational public health services, the state expects that measurable benefits will be realized to the health of communities in Washington as a result of the improved capacity of the governmental public health system. Close coordination and sharing of services are integral to increasing system capacity.

(2)(a) Funding for foundational public health services shall be appropriated to the office of financial management. The office of financial management may only allocate funding to the department if the department, after consultation with federally recognized Indian tribes pursuant to chapter 43.376 RCW, jointly certifies with a state association representing local health jurisdictions and the state board of health, to the office of financial management that they are in agreement on the distribution and uses of state foundational public health services funding across the public health system.

(b) If joint certification is provided, the department shall distribute foundational public health services funding according to the agreed-upon distribution and uses. If joint certification is not provided, appropriations for this purpose shall lapse.

(3) By October 1, 2020, the department, in partnership with sovereign tribal nations, local health jurisdictions, and the state board of health, shall report on:

(a) Service delivery models, and a plan for further implementation of successful models;

(b) Changes in capacity of the governmental public health system; and

(c) Progress made to improve health outcomes.

(4) For purposes of this section:

(a) "Foundational public health services" means a limited statewide set of defined public health services within the following areas:

(i) Control of communicable diseases and other notifiable conditions;

(ii) Chronic disease and injury prevention;

(iii) Environmental public health;

(iv) Maternal, child, and family health;

(v) Access to and linkage with medical, oral, and behavioral health services;

(vi) Vital records; and

(vii) Cross-cutting capabilities, including:

(A) Assessing the health of populations;

(B) Public health emergency planning;

(C) Communications;

(D) Policy development and support;

(E) Community partnership development; and

(F) Business competencies.

(b) "Governmental public health system" means the state department of health, state board of health, local health jurisdictions, sovereign tribal nations, and Indian health programs located within Washington.

(c) "Indian health programs" means tribally operated health programs, urban Indian health programs, tribal epidemiology centers, the American Indian health commission for Washington state, and the Northwest Portland area Indian health board.

(d) "Local health jurisdictions" means a public health agency organized under chapter 70.05, 70.08, or 70.46 RCW.

(e) "Service delivery models" means a systematic sharing of resources and function among state and local governmental public health entities, sovereign tribal nations, and Indian health programs to increase capacity and improve efficiency and effectiveness.

[ 2019 c 14 s 2.]